Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 9 Workers' Compensation
11-9-106. Penalties for misrepresentation.

Any person or entity who willfully and knowingly makes any material false statement or representation, who willfully and knowingly omits or conceals any material information, or who willfully and knowingly employs any device, scheme, or artifice for the purpose of:

Obtaining any benefit or payment;

Defeating or wrongfully increasing or wrongfully decreasing any claim for benefit or payment; or

Obtaining or avoiding workers' compensation coverage or avoiding payment of the proper insurance premium, or who aids and abets for any of said purposes, under this chapter shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Fifty percent (50%) of any criminal fine imposed and collected under this subdivision (a)(1) or subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall be paid and allocated in accordance with applicable law to the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund administered by the Workers' Compensation Commission.

It is to be understood that any person or entity with whom any person identified in subdivision (a)(1) of this section has conspired to achieve the proscribed ends shall, by reason of such conspiracy, be guilty as a principal of a Class D felony.

A copy of subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be placed on all forms prescribed by the Workers' Compensation Commission for the use of injured employees claiming benefits and for the use of employers in responding to such employees' claims under this chapter.

Where the Workers' Compensation Commission or the Insurance Commissioner finds that false statements or representations were made willfully and knowingly, that material information was willfully and knowingly omitted or concealed, or that any device, scheme, or artifice was willfully and knowingly employed for the purpose of:

Obtaining benefits or payments;

Obtaining, wrongfully increasing, wrongfully decreasing, or defeating any claim for benefit or payment; or

Obtaining or avoiding workers' compensation coverage or avoiding payment of the proper insurance premium under this chapter or that any other criminal violations related thereto were committed,

There shall be established within the State Insurance Department a Workers' Compensation Fraud Investigation Unit, funded by the Workers' Compensation Commission, which will be headed and supervised by a director who may also serve as the director of any other designated insurance fraud investigation division within the department, in which event the director's compensation shall be paid solely from the funds of such insurance fraud investigation division.

The unit is designated as a law enforcement agency.

The unit herein designated will investigate workers' compensation fraud, additional criminal violations that may be related thereto, and any other insurance fraud matters as may be assigned at the discretion of the director.

The Insurance Commissioner shall designate the personnel assigned to the unit, who shall conduct investigations under this subdivision (d)(1)(B).

A person designated and employed as an investigator by the unit shall:

Be a certified law enforcement officer under § 12-9-101 et seq.; and

Have statewide law enforcement jurisdiction and authority.

Personnel hired as law enforcement officers shall be state-certified law enforcement or the equivalent in national or military law enforcement experience as approved by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

The Insurance Commissioner and his or her deputies and assistants and the fraud director and his or her deputies and assistants shall be vested with the power of enforcing this section and rendering more effective the disclosure and apprehension of persons or entities who abuse the workers' compensation system as established by the General Assembly by making false or misleading statements for the purpose of either obtaining, wrongfully increasing, wrongfully decreasing or defeating the payment of benefits, obtaining or avoiding workers' compensation coverage, or avoiding payment of the proper insurance premium.

It shall be the duty of the unit to assist the Insurance Commissioner and the department in the performance of their duties, and, further, to determine the identity of carriers, employers, or employees who within the State of Arkansas have violated subsection (a) of this section and report the violation to the Workers' Compensation Commission and to the Insurance Commissioner, who shall, in turn, be responsible for reporting the violation to the prosecuting attorney having criminal jurisdiction in the matter.

With respect to the subject of any investigation being conducted by the unit, the Insurance Commissioner and his or her deputies and assistants and the fraud director and his or her deputies and assistants shall have the power of subpoena and may:

Subpoena witnesses;

Administer oaths or affirmations and examine any individual under oath; and

Require and compel the production of records, books, papers, contracts, and other documents.

Subpoenas of witnesses shall be served in the same manner as if issued by a circuit court.

If any individual fails to obey a subpoena issued and served pursuant to this section with respect to any matter concerning which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, then upon application of the commissioner or fraud director, the Pulaski County Circuit Court or the circuit court of the county where the subpoena was served may issue an order requiring the individual to comply with the subpoena and to testify.

Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.

If any person has refused in connection with an investigation by the fraud director to be examined under oath concerning his or her affairs, then the fraud director is authorized to conduct and enforce by all appropriate and available means any examination under oath in any state or territory of the United States in which any officer, director, or manager may then presently be to the full extent permitted by the laws of the state or territory.

Any person testifying falsely under oath or affirmation in this state as to any matter material to any investigation or hearing conducted pursuant to this subdivision (d)(4), or any workers' compensation hearing, shall upon conviction be guilty of perjury and punished accordingly.

Fees and mileage of the officers serving the subpoenas and of the witnesses in answer to subpoenas shall be as provided by law.

Every carrier or employer who has reason to suspect that a violation of subdivision (a)(1) of this section has occurred shall be required to report all pertinent matters relating thereto to the unit.

No such carrier shall be liable to any employer or employee for any such report, and no employer shall be liable to any employee for such a report unless it knowingly and intentionally includes false information.

Any such carrier or employer who willfully and knowingly fails to report any such violation shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for a period not to exceed one (1) year or by both fine and imprisonment.

Fifty percent (50%) of any criminal fine imposed and collected under this subdivision (d)(6)(C) shall be paid and allocated in accordance with applicable law to the fund administered by the commission.

Although not mandated to report suspected violations of subdivision (a)(1) of this section by an employer or employee, any employee who does make such a report shall not be liable to the employer or employee whose suspected violations he or she has reported.

In addition, any immunity from liability provisions of the Arkansas Insurance Code, § 23-60-101 et seq., applicable to the reporting of suspected fraudulent insurance acts shall also be applicable to the reporting of information under this subdivision (d)(6).

For the purpose of imposing criminal sanctions or a fine for violation of the duties of this chapter, the prosecuting attorney shall have the right and discretion to proceed against any person or organization responsible for such violations, both organizational and individual liability being intended by this chapter.

The prosecuting attorney of the district to whom a suspected violation of subsection (a) of this section, § 11-9-402(c), § 11-9-406, or any other criminal violations that may be related thereto, has been referred shall, for the purpose of assisting him or her in such prosecutions, have the authority to appoint as special deputy prosecuting attorneys licensed attorneys at law in the employment of the unit or any other designated insurance fraud investigation division within the department. Such special deputy prosecuting attorneys shall, for the purpose of the prosecutions to which they are assigned, be responsible to and report to the prosecuting attorney.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it is the specific intent of this section that active investigatory files as maintained by the department and by the unit be deemed confidential and privileged and not be made open to the public until the matter under investigation is closed by the fraud director with the consent of the Insurance Commissioner, except that such active investigatory files shall also be subject to any confidentiality provisions of the Arkansas Insurance Code, § 23-60-101 et seq., that are applicable to the investigation of fraudulent insurance acts.

The Insurance Commissioner, with the cooperation and assistance of the Workers' Compensation Commission, is authorized to establish rules as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to create a civil cause of action.

the Chair of the Workers' Compensation Commission or the Insurance Commissioner shall refer the matter for appropriate action to the prosecuting attorney having criminal jurisdiction in the matter.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 35, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, § 6; Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 17; 1979, No. 253, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1335; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 17; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 5; 1997, No. 808, §§ 1-13; 1999, No. 881, § 1; 2001, No. 743, § 1; 2013, No. 984, § 1;
2019, No. 315, § 775.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted (d)(1)(A)(ii); redesignated part of (d)(1)(B)(ii) as (d)(1)(B)(iv); substituted “shall conduct” for “upon meeting the qualifications established by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, shall have the powers of specialized law enforcement officers of the State of Arkansas for the purpose of conducting” in (d)(1)(B)(ii); inserted (d)(1)(B)(iii); and, in (d)(1)(B)(iv), deleted “specialized” preceding “law enforcement,” substituted “be state” for “have a minimum of three (3) years of,” and “or the” for “experience or its.”

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (g).

11-9-107. Penalties for discrimination for filing claim.

Any employer who willfully discriminates in regard to the hiring or tenure of work or any term or condition of work of any individual on account of the individual's claim for benefits under this chapter, or who in any manner obstructs or impedes the filing of claims for benefits under this chapter, shall be subject to a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) as determined by the Workers' Compensation Commission.

This fine shall be payable to the Second Injury Trust Fund and paid by the employer and not by the carrier.

In addition, the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover costs and a reasonable attorney's fee payable from the fine.

Provided, however, if the employee is the nonprevailing party, the attorney's fee and costs shall, at the election of the employer, be paid by the employee or deducted from future workers' compensation benefits.

The employer may also be guilty of a Class D felony.

This section shall not be construed as establishing an exception to the employment at will doctrine.

A purpose of this section is to preserve the exclusive remedy doctrine and specifically annul any case law inconsistent herewith, including, but not necessarily limited to: Wal-Mart Stores, Inc. v. Baysinger, 306 Ark. 239, 812 S.W.2d 463 (1991); Mapco, Inc. v. Payne, 306 Ark. 198, 812 S.W.2d 483 (1991); and Thomas v. Valmac Industries, Inc., 306 Ark. 228, 812 S.W.2d 673 (1991).

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 35, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Init. Meas. 1968, No. 1, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1335; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 6.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-108. Waiver of compensation void — Exception.

No agreement by an employee to waive his or her right to compensation shall be valid, and no contract, regulation, or device whatsoever shall operate to relieve the employer or carrier, in whole or in part, from any liability created by this chapter, except as specifically provided elsewhere in this chapter.

However, any officer of a corporation, sole proprietor, partner of a partnership, member of a limited liability company, member of a professional association, or self-employed employer who is not a subcontractor and who owns and operates his or her own business may by agreement or contract exclude himself or herself from coverage or waive his or her right to coverage or compensation under this chapter.

If the exclusion from coverage of the officer of a corporation, sole proprietor, partner of a partnership, member of a limited liability company, member of a professional association, or self-employed employer reduces the number of employees of the business to fewer than three (3), the employer shall nevertheless continue to provide workers' compensation coverage for the employees.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 20, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1971, No. 162, § 1; 1981, No. 631, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1320; Acts 2007, No. 546, § 1.

11-9-109. Agreement to pay premium void.

No agreement by an employee to pay any portion of the premium paid by his or her employer to a carrier or to contribute to a safety program as provided under § 11-9-409 or a benefit fund or department maintained by the employer for the purpose of providing compensation or medical services and supplies as required by this chapter shall be valid.

Any employer who makes a deduction for those purposes from the pay of any employee entitled to the benefits of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 20, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1320; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 7.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-110. Compensation nonassignable, etc., and payable to dependents only — Child support obligations excepted — Definition.

The right to compensation shall not be assignable and shall not be subject to garnishment, attachment, levy, execution, or any other legal process, except for child support obligations and moneys retained by the Division of Correction under § 12-30-406(a)(1).

Money compensation to dependents of a deceased employee shall not constitute assets of the estate of the deceased employee and shall be payable to and for the benefit of the dependents alone.

On or after June 30, 1993, the Workers' Compensation Commission shall forward monthly a computer tape listing the name, address, and Social Security number, if available, on all persons for whom the commission has established a file during the preceding month to the Office of Child Support Enforcement. The computer tape shall also include the name of the workers' compensation carrier and the name of the employer.

The same information shall be provided to individuals who apply for the information with the commission on an individual employee to an individual certifying that they have an interest in the child support obligations of the employee on whom the information is requested.

Amounts withheld from weekly compensation benefits for child support obligations shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the benefit amount.

Amounts withheld from a lump-sum settlement on a joint petition for child support obligations shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the settlement amount.

Any amount withheld under subsection (d) of this section shall be paid through the appropriate court payable to the person or agency to whom the obligation is payable.

Any amount withheld pursuant to the provisions of this section shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the employee as workers' compensation and paid by the employee to the person or agency to whom the obligation is payable.

For purposes of this section, “child support obligations” is defined as only those support obligations that are contained in a decree or order of the circuit court which provides for the payment of money for the support and care of any child or children.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 21, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1321; Acts 1987, No. 524, § 2; 1995, No. 1184, §§ 21, 28; 2001, No. 1651, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 696.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a).

11-9-111. Compensation payable to certain alien dependents.

Compensation to alien nonresidents of the United States or Canada shall be the same in amount as provided for residents, except that alien nonresident dependents in any foreign country shall be limited to the surviving wife or children or, if there is no surviving wife or children, to the surviving father or mother whom the employee has supported, either wholly or in part, for the period of one (1) year prior to the date of the injury.

Upon its own motion or upon application of an interested party, the Workers' Compensation Commission may order the payment of all future compensation to be paid in one (1) lump sum, which shall be equal to one-half (½) of the face value of all future installments of compensation.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 16, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1316.

11-9-112. Preference for due compensation.

Compensation due an injured employee or his or her dependents shall have the same preference as is allowed by law to an employee for unpaid wages.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 22, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1322.

11-9-113. Mental injury or illness.

A mental injury or illness is not a compensable injury unless it is caused by physical injury to the employee's body, and shall not be considered an injury arising out of and in the course of employment or compensable unless it is demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence; provided, however, that this physical injury limitation shall not apply to any victim of a crime of violence.

No mental injury or illness under this section shall be compensable unless it is also diagnosed by a licensed psychiatrist or psychologist and unless the diagnosis of the condition meets the criteria established in the most current issue of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, where a claim is by reason of mental injury or illness, the employee shall be limited to twenty-six (26) weeks of disability benefits.

In case death results directly from the mental injury or illness within a period of one (1) year, compensation shall be paid the dependents as provided in other death cases under this chapter.

Death directly or indirectly related to the mental injury or illness occurring one (1) year or more from the incident resulting in the mental injury or illness shall not be a compensable injury.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 8.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-114. Heart or lung injury or illness.

A cardiovascular, coronary, pulmonary, respiratory, or cerebrovascular accident or myocardial infarction causing injury, illness, or death is a compensable injury only if, in relation to other factors contributing to the physical harm, an accident is the major cause of the physical harm.

An injury or disease included in subsection (a) of this section shall not be deemed to be a compensable injury unless it is shown that the exertion of the work necessary to precipitate the disability or death was extraordinary and unusual in comparison to the employee's usual work in the course of the employee's regular employment or, alternately, that some unusual and unpredicted incident occurred which is found to have been the major cause of the physical harm.

Stress, physical or mental, shall not be considered in determining whether the employee or claimant has met his or her burden of proof.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 8.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-115. Disclosure of child support obligations.

At any time an application is made for workers' compensation, an employer shall require the applicant for compensation to state whether or not the applicant has child support obligations, if the obligations are current or past due, and to whom the obligations are payable.

The application shall also include the name of the workers' compensation carrier and the name of the employer.

The employer shall forward a copy of the application to the Office of Child Support Enforcement of the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1185, § 1.

Cross References.

The Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, § 9-17-101 et seq.

11-9-116. Fund transfer to support Workers' Compensation Fraud Unit of the State Insurance Department.

One (1) month before the beginning of any fiscal quarter, the Insurance Commissioner shall provide to the Workers' Compensation Commission the estimated funding need of the Workers' Compensation Fraud Investigation Unit of the State Insurance Department for the ensuing quarter.

Such provided certification shall itemize each position to be utilized in the unit and funded by the commission and make estimates of all other budgetary line items necessary to provide support to the unit.

This certification must deduct unexpended and unencumbered balances of the unit from the previous quarter, so that only the current need, excluding unexpended and unencumbered funds, is certified for fund transfer authorized in this section.

On or before the first day of each fiscal quarter, the commission shall certify to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State that funds are available for transfer, upon which certification the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Treasurer of State, and the Auditor of State shall transfer those funds from the Workers' Compensation Fund of the commission to the fund account used for the maintenance, operation, and support of the unit.

The sum of the four (4) quarterly transfers in each fiscal year ending June 30 cannot exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1179, § 9.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 11-9-101 — 11-9-115 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

11-9-117. Carpal tunnel syndrome guidelines.

Pursuant to its rulemaking authority, the Workers' Compensation Commission shall be empowered to enact medical diagnostic and treatment guidelines regarding occupational carpal tunnel syndrome upon the joint recommendation of the Arkansas chapter of the American Federation of Labor and Congress of Industrial Organizations and the Arkansas State Chamber of Commerce.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1281, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 11-9-101—11-9-116 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

11-9-118. Provider payments while claims are pending.

No hospital, physician, or other healthcare provider shall bill or attempt to collect any fee or any portion of a fee for services rendered to an employee due to a work-related injury or report to any credit reporting agency any failure of the employee to make the payment, when a claim for compensation has been filed under this chapter and the hospital, physician, or healthcare provider has received actual notice given in writing by the employee or the employee's representative. Actual notice shall be deemed received by the hospital, physician, or healthcare provider five (5) days after mailing by certified mail by the employee or his or her representative to the hospital, physician, or healthcare provider.

The notice shall include:

The name of the employer;

The name of the insurer, if known;

The name of the employee receiving the services;

The general nature of the injury, if known; and

Where a claim has been filed, the claim number, if known.

When an injury or bill is found to be noncompensable under this chapter, the hospital, physician, or other healthcare provider shall be entitled to pursue the employee for any unpaid portion of the fee or other charges for authorized services provided to the employee. Any applicable statute of limitations for an action for the fees or other charges shall be tolled from the time notice is given to the hospital, physician, or other healthcare provider until a determination of noncompensability in regard to the injury which is the basis of the services is made, or in the event that there is an appeal to the Workers' Compensation Commission, the Court of Appeals, or the Supreme Court, until a final determination of noncompensability is rendered and all appeal deadlines have passed.

This section shall not avoid, modify, or amend any other section or subsection of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the prohibition against balance billing contained in § 11-9-508(d)(3) and any rules adopted thereunder.

An order by the commission pursuant to this section shall stay all proceedings for collection.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1281, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 776.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 11-9-101—11-9-116 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d).

Subchapter 2
— Workers' Compensation Commission

Cross References.

Jurisdiction over injury claims of state employees, § 19-10-402.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1979, No. 663, § 4: Mar. 29, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is presently no authority for the appointment of a special member of the Arkansas Workers' Compensation Commission to serve on the Commission when a regular member is disqualified to participate in any matter before the Commission; that since the Commission is composed of only three members, it is in the best interest of all persons concerned that specific authority be provided for the appointment of a special member of the Commission to hear and participate in the determination of any matter before the Commission when a regular member is disqualified for any reason; that this Act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 15: July 1, 1986. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the increased benefits and improvements in the administration of the Workers' Compensation system in Arkansas is in the best interest of employees, employers, and the public in general; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1986.”

Acts 1991, No. 1060, § 16: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-9-201. Members — Appointment — Compensation.

The Workers' Compensation Commission shall consist of three (3) members appointed by the Governor for terms of six (6) years who shall devote their entire time to the duties of the commission and shall administer the provisions of this chapter.

One (1) member shall be an attorney who has at least five (5) years' experience representing employers in workers' compensation matters or shall be a person who, on account of his or her previous vocation, employment, or affiliation, has had at least five (5) years of experience as an employer and can be classed as a representative of employers.

One (1) member shall be an attorney who has at least five (5) years' experience predominantly representing claimants in workers' compensation matters or employees in labor relations matters or shall be a person who, on account of his or her previous vocation, employment, or affiliation, has had at least five (5) years of membership in a bona fide labor organization and can be classed as a representative of employees.

The third member shall be an attorney, who shall be chair of the commission and who shall have been engaged in active practice of law in the State of Arkansas for not less than five (5) years next preceding the date of his or her appointment.

Each member shall receive a salary of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per annum or such other maximum salary as may be established by the Arkansas Constitution for salaries of state employees. The salaries shall be paid from the Workers' Compensation Fund and shall be paid in the manner as are salaries of other state officials or employees.

When any member of the commission is disqualified for any reason to hear and participate in the determination of any matter pending before the commission, the Governor shall appoint a qualified person to hear and participate in the decision on the particular matter. The special member so appointed shall have all authority and responsibility with respect to the particular matter before the commission as if the person were a regular member of the commission but shall have no authority or responsibility with respect to any other matter before the commission.

A person appointed as a special member of the commission pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision shall be entitled to receive a per diem not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each day spent in attending to his or her duties as a special member of the commission. The compensation shall be paid from any funds of the commission which are available for or may legally be used for paying such per diem.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 42, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1979, No. 663, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1342 — 81-1342.2; Acts 1995, No. 546, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be affected by Acts 1977, No. 113, which added a consumer representative to certain boards.

Cross References.

Compensation of State Boards, § 25-16-901 et seq.

11-9-202. Members — Bond.

The members shall give bond in the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the state for the faithful performance of their duties.

The bond shall be approved by the Governor and kept on file in the office of the Secretary of State.

Any action on the bond for breach thereof shall be instituted by the Attorney General and shall be in the name of the State of Arkansas.

The premium upon the bonds shall be paid out of the Workers' Compensation Fund.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 42, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1342.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subsection (c) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

11-9-203. Members — Removal.

The Governor may, at any time, remove any member of the Workers' Compensation Commission for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office, giving him or her in advance a copy of the charges preferred and an opportunity of being publicly heard, in person or by counsel, upon not less than ten (10) days' notice.

A representative of the Attorney General's office shall attend the proceedings and upon the Governor's request shall advise or assist him or her therein.

Either party may procure the attendance of witnesses and their testimony as is now provided by the Civil Code in ordinary actions.

If a member is removed, the Governor shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a complete statement of all charges made against the member and his or her findings, together with a complete record of the proceedings had and a transcript of testimony. It shall constitute a public record of the state.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 42, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1342.

11-9-204. Proceedings.

Members of the Workers' Compensation Commission shall be considered as officers and shall take the oath prescribed by the Arkansas Constitution and the laws of Arkansas.

A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and vacancies shall not impair the right of the remaining members to exercise all the powers of the full commission, so long as a majority remains.

Any investigation, inquiry, or hearing which the commission is authorized to hold or undertake may be held or undertaken by or before any one (1) member of the commission, or referee acting for him or her, under authorization of the commission.

The commission shall maintain and keep open, during reasonable business hours, an office in Little Rock, for the transaction of business, at which office its official records and papers shall be kept.

The commission or any member of the commission may hold sessions and conduct hearings at any place within the state.

The commission shall have a seal for authentication of its orders, awards, and proceedings, upon which shall be inscribed the words: “Workers' Compensation Commission, State of Arkansas”.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 42, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1342.

Cross References.

Oath, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 20.